Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1022.
do enact as follows:AB1022,11Section 1. 20.144 (1) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1022,3,7220.144 (1) (g) General program operations. The amounts in the schedule for 3the general program operations of the department of financial institutions. Except 4as provided in pars. (a), (h), (i), (j), and (u) and sub. subs. (3) and (5), all moneys 1received by the department, other than by the office of credit unions and the 2division of banking, and 88 percent of all moneys received by the office of credit 3unions and the department’s division of banking shall be credited to this 4appropriation, but any balance at the close of a fiscal year under this appropriation 5shall lapse to the general fund. Annually, $150,000 of the amounts received under 6this appropriation account shall be transferred to the appropriation account under 7s. 20.575 (1) (g).AB1022,28Section 2. 20.144 (5) (title) of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,3,9920.144 (5) (title) Baby bond program.AB1022,310Section 3. 20.144 (5) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,3,121120.144 (5) (a) Administrative expenses. A sum sufficient for the 12administrative expenses of the baby bond program under s. 224.58.AB1022,413Section 4. 20.144 (5) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,3,151420.144 (5) (c) Deposits into baby bond fund. A sum sufficient for deposits into 15the baby bond fund as provided in s. 224.58 (3) (b) 2.AB1022,516Section 5. 20.144 (5) (j) of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,3,201720.144 (5) (j) Donations, gifts, and grants. All moneys received from 18donations, gifts, grants, bequests, or other contributions to the baby bond program 19under s. 224.58, to carry out the purpose for which received, including deposit into 20the baby bond fund.AB1022,621Section 6. 20.144 (5) (q) of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,4,22220.144 (5) (q) Payment of distributions; crediting accounts. From the baby 1bond fund, a sum sufficient for the payment of distributions under s. 224.58 (4) and 2to credit accounts under s. 224.58 (3) (b) 2.AB1022,73Section 7. 25.14 (1) (a) 20. of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,4,4425.14 (1) (a) 20. The baby bond fund.AB1022,85Section 8. 25.17 (1) (aL) of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,4,6625.17 (1) (aL) Baby bond fund (s. 25.32);AB1022,97Section 9. 25.17 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1022,4,15825.17 (3) (a) Invest the core retirement investment trust, baby bond fund, 9state life fund, local government property insurance fund, veterans trust fund, and 10injured patients and families compensation fund in loans, securities, and any other 11investments authorized by s. 620.22, and in bonds or other evidences of 12indebtedness or preferred stock of companies engaged in the finance business 13whether as direct lenders or as holding companies owning subsidiaries engaged in 14the finance business. Investments permitted by sub. (4) are permitted investments 15under this subsection.AB1022,1016Section 10. 25.18 (1) (q) of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,4,191725.18 (1) (q) Invest any of the assets of the baby bond fund in any investment 18that is an authorized investment for assets in the variable retirement investment 19trust under s. 25.17 (5).AB1022,1120Section 11. 25.32 of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,4,232125.32 Baby bond fund. (1) There is established a separate nonlapsible 22trust fund designated as the baby bond fund. The fund shall consist of all of the 23following:AB1022,5,11(a) Money deposited into the fund under s. 224.58 (3) (b) 2.AB1022,5,32(b) All donations, gifts, grants, bequests, or other contributions deposited into 3the fund under s. 224.58 (6).AB1022,5,44(c) All earnings and other investment income of the fund.AB1022,5,75(2) Except as provided in s. 25.187, moneys in the baby bond fund may be 6expended only for the purpose of making distributions under s. 224.58 (4) and 7deposits under s. 224.58 (3) (b) 2.AB1022,128Section 12. 69.14 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1022,5,13969.14 (1) (a) Filing deadline. A record of birth for every birth that occurs in 10this state shall be filed within 5 days after the birth with the state registrar, who 11shall register the birth under this subchapter. The state registrar shall submit a 12copy of the record of birth to the department of financial institutions, but shall 13redact from the copy any parent’s social security number.AB1022,1314Section 13. 69.20 (3) (b) 6. of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,5,171569.20 (3) (b) 6. The information is submitted to the department of financial 16institutions for the purpose of administering the baby bond program under s. 17224.58.AB1022,1418Section 14. 69.20 (3) (i) of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,5,211969.20 (3) (i) The state registrar shall disclose information on birth records, 20other than a parent’s social security number, to the department of financial 21institutions for use in the administration of the baby bond program under s. 224.58.AB1022,1522Section 15. 69.22 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1022,6,52369.22 (6) The state registrar may charge a reasonable fee for providing 1searches of vital records and for providing copies of vital records to state agencies 2for program use, except that no fee may be charged for providing a copy of the record 3of birth to the department of financial institutions under s. 69.14 (1) (a). The 4register of deeds may provide free searches and free copies to agencies in his or her 5county at the direction of the county board.AB1022,166Section 16. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,6,8771.05 (6) (b) 57. The amount of a distribution made to an account beneficiary, 8as defined in s. 224.58 (1) (b), under s. 224.58 (4).AB1022,179Section 17. 71.78 (4) (w) of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,6,111071.78 (4) (w) The department of financial institutions and the department of 11health services for the purpose of determining eligibility under s. 224.58 (3) (a) 1.AB1022,1812Section 18. 224.58 of the statutes is created to read:AB1022,6,1313224.58 Baby bond program. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB1022,6,1514(a) “Account” means a baby bond account established by the department 15under sub. (3).AB1022,6,1716(b) “Account beneficiary” means an individual for whom the department 17establishes an account.AB1022,6,1818(c) “Domestic business entity” has the meaning given in s. 180.1100 (2). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1022 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1022 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1022 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1022 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1022: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting